Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.115

Injunctions.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court of Thurston county, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

[ 1961 c 83 s 15. Formerly RCW 15.14.150.]